Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-107
Written opinions to be reported; format.

The written opinions of any court of impeachment shall be reported in the volume of the Nebraska Reports issued after the adjournments of such court. In the alternative or in addition to print format, such opinions may be published in electronic format in the manner and under such title designated by the Supreme Court.

Laws 1879, § 7, p. 83;

R.S.1913, § 1134;

C.S.1922, § 1063;

C.S.1929, § 27-107;

R.S.1943, § 24-107;

Laws 1995, LB 271, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB301, § 1.